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2UZ−FE ENGINE (RM630E)

DTC P0135/21 Oxygen Sensor Heater Circuit
Malfunction (Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0141/21 Oxygen Sensor Heater Circuit
Malfunction (Bank 1 Sensor 2)

DTC P0155/28 Oxygen Sensor Heater Circuit
Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 1)

DTC P0161/28 Oxygen Sensor Heater Circuit
Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0130/21, P0150/28 (Oxygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 1 Sensor 1)
(Bank 2 Sensor 1)) on page DI−51.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0135/21
S Open or short in heater circuit of oxygen sensor

P0141/21
P0155/28

Open or short in heater circuit of oxygen sensor 0.5 sec. or
more

S Open or short in heater circuit of oxygen sensor
S Oxygen sensor heater

P0155/28
P0161/28

more
yg

S Engine ECU

HINT:
S Bank 1 refers to bank that includes cylinder No.1.
S Bank 2 refers to bank that does not include cylinder No.1.
S Sensor1 refers to thesensorcloser to theenginebody.
S Sensor2 refers to thesensor fartheraway fromtheenginebody.

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer toDTCP0 130/21, P 0150/28 (OxygenSensorCircuitMalfunction (Bank 1 Sensor 1)
(Bank 2 Sensor 1)) on page DI−51 for the WIRING DIAGRAM.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because freeze framerecords theengineconditionswhen
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −
fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the timeof themalfunction.
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1 Check voltage between terminals HTR, HTR2, HTL, HTL2 of engine ECU
connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals HTR, HTR2, HTL, HTL2 of
the engine ECU connector and body ground.
HINT:
S Connect terminal HTR to bank 2 sensor 1.
S Connect terminal HTR2 to bank 2 sensor 2.
S Connect terminal HTL to bank 1 sensor 1.
S Connect terminalHTL2 tobank 1 sensor2.

OK:
Voltage:9 − 14 V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

2 Check resistance of oxygen sensor heater (See page FI−71).

NG Replace oxygen sensor.

OK

Check and repair harness or connector be-
tween main relay and oxygen sensor and en-
gine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .


